Hawaii, session 2026, GM1321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1, Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part II to be*appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§346- State-funded financial assistance for colorectal
cancer screenings; treatment. (a) The department shall provide
state-funded financial assistance, as appropriated by the
legislature, to pay for colorectal cancer screenings for
residents of the State who:
(1) Are uninsured;
(2) Have health care coverage that does not provide
coverage without cost sharing for colorectal cancer
screenings that meet the requirements of sections
431:10A-122 and 432:1-617;
(3) Are permanent United States resident aliens but are
ineligible for medicaid; or
(4) Are nonresident aliens and are ineligible for
medicaid.
2026-3472 HB1969 GDI HMSO
raiiiMiMiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) The state-funded colorectal cancer screenings shall
meet the requirements of sections 431:10A-122 and 432:1-617.
(c) If, as a result of a colorectal cancer screening
conducted pursuant to this section, an uninsured resident of the
State requires treatment for colorectal cancer, the uninsured
resident shall receive state-funded coverage for the colorectal
cancer treatment.”
SECTION 2. Section 431:10A-122, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
is amended to read as follows:
"[•{•] §431: lOA-122 [J—Geien] Colorectal cancer screening
coverage. (a) Each policy of accident and health or sickness
insurance providing coverage for health care, except for
policies that only provide coverage for specified diseases or
other limited benefit coverage, shall provide coverage for
[col-orectal-cancer] colorectal cancer screening by all A and B
grade screening modalities as recommended by the United States
Preventive Services Task Force.
(b) Beginning March 1, 2011, all health insurance
providers in Hawaii shall inform their insured about the risk
associated with undiagnosed [col-orcctal-cancer] colorectal
2026-3472 HB1969 GDI HMSO

nnmiiiiiiiiinm

Page 3 1969
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D, 1
C.D. 1
cancer and encourage the insured to consult with the insured's
physician about available screening options.
(c) Coverage shall include a follow-up colonoscopy
conducted after a positive stool-based test, blood-based test,
or direct visualization test for colorectal cancer screening.
(d) The coverage required under this section shall not be
subject to a deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or any other
cost-sharing requirements."
SECTION 3. Section 432:1-617, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t] §432:1-617 —Colon] Colorectal cancer screening
coverage. (a) All individual and group hospital and medical
service contracts providing health care coverage shall provide
coverage for [eel-orectal-cancer] colorectal cancer screening by
all A and B grade screening modalities as recommended by the
United States Preventive Services Task Force.
(b) Beginning March 1, 2011, all [hea-lt-h insurance
providers] mutual benefit societies in Hawaii shall inform their
[insured] subscribers or members of the risk associated with
undiagnosed colorectal cancer and encourage the [i^^&ur^ed]
subscriber or member to consult with the [in-sured' s]
2026-3472 HB1969 GDI HMSO
MIUimMillliillll

Page 4
H.B. NO. ■
C.D. 1
subscriber's or member's physician about available screening
options.
(c) Coverage shall include a follow-up colonoscopy
conducted after a positive stool-based test, blood-based test,
or direct visualization test for colorectal cancer screening.
(d) The coverage required under this section shall not be
subject to a deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or any other
cost-sharing requirements."
SECTION 4. (a) The department of human services shall
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to
implement section 1 of this Act, including rules establishing an
application process for state-funded colorectal cancer
screenings and treatment.
(b) In adopting rules pursuant to this Act, the department
shall ensure that:
(1) The state-funded colorectal cancer screenings meet the
requirements of sections 431:10A-122 and 432:1-617,
Hawaii Revised Statutes; and
(2) No cost-sharing requirements are imposed.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,800,000 or so much
2026-3472 HB1969 CDl HMSO

Page 5 1969
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
department of human services to develop and implement a public
assistance program offering state-funded colorectal cancer
screenings and treatment, including the establishment of one
full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) position to manage and oversee
the program.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
human services for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3472 HB1969 CDl HMSO
■iiiMiiiiiimiiiiiM

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 9th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1969, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1969, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Sedate
166-26